Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 7. Comprehensive Health Education

§ 131.
Definition.

As used in this title, “comprehensive health education” means a systematic and extensive elementary and secondary educational program designed to provide a variety of learning experiences based upon knowledge of the human organism as it functions within its environment. The term includes the study of:

Body structure and function, including the physical, psychosocial, and psychological basis of human development, sexuality, and reproduction.

Community health to include environmental health, pollution, public health, and world health.

Safety, including:

first aid, disaster prevention, and accident prevention; and

information regarding and practice of compression-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of automated external defibrillators.

Disease, such as HIV infection, other sexually transmitted diseases, as well as other communicable diseases, and the prevention of disease.

Family health and mental health, including instruction that promotes the development of responsible personal behavior involving decision making about sexual activity, including abstinence; skills that strengthen existing family ties involving communication, cooperation, and interaction between parents and students; and instruction to aid in the establishment of strong family life in the future, thereby contributing to the enrichment of the community; and that promotes an understanding of depression and the signs of suicide risk in a family member or fellow student that includes how to respond appropriately and seek help and provides an awareness of the available school and community resources such as the local suicide crisis hotline.

Personal health habits, including dental health.

Consumer health, including health careers, health costs, and utilizing health services.

Human growth and development, including understanding the physical, emotional, and social elements of individual development and interpersonal relationships, including instruction in parenting methods and styles. This shall include information regarding the possible outcomes of premature sexual activity, contraceptives, adolescent pregnancy, childbirth, adoption, and abortion.

Drugs, including education about alcohol, caffeine, nicotine, and prescribed drugs.

Nutrition.

How to recognize and prevent sexual abuse and sexual violence, including developmentally appropriate instruction about promoting healthy and respectful relationships, developing and maintaining effective communication with trusted adults, recognizing sexually offending behaviors, and gaining awareness of available school and community resources. An employee of the school shall be in the room during the provision of all instruction or information presented under this subdivision.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 3, 1978; amended

1987, No. 270

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2009, No. 1

, § 3, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 16, 2012;

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. May 16, 2012;

2019, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Nov. 1, 2020.

§ 132.
Secondary schools; provision of contraceptives.

In order to prevent or reduce unintended pregnancies and sexually transmitted diseases, each school district shall make condoms available to all students in its secondary schools, free of charge. School district administrative teams, in consultation with school district nursing staff, shall determine the best manner in which to make condoms available to students. At a minimum, condoms shall be placed in locations that are safe and readily accessible to students, including the school nurse’s office.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 133.
Supervisor; comprehensive health education.

The Secretary with the approval of the State Board may appoint one qualified person to supervise the preparation of appropriate curricula for use in the public schools, to promote programs for the preparation of teachers to teach these curricula, and to assist in the development of comprehensive health education programs.

[Repealed.]

Vermont school districts may include a module within the secondary school health class curricula relating to cervical cancer and the human papillomavirus. The Agency shall work with relevant medical authorities to update the current model module to reflect up-to-date information and practices for health education in this area.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 3, 1978; amended

2007, No. 203

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. June 10, 2008;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 134.
Religious exemption.

Any student whose parent shall present to the school principal a signed statement that the teaching of disease, its symptoms, development, and treatment, conflicts with the parents’ religious convictions shall be exempt from such instruction, and no child so exempt shall be penalized by reason of that exemption.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 3, 1978; amended

1987, No. 270

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 135.
Program development; community advisory council.

The Agency shall offer assistance to school districts and supervisory unions to provide teacher instruction in comprehensive health education.

Any school district board or supervisory union board may establish a comprehensive health education community advisory council to assist the school board in developing and implementing comprehensive health education. The school board shall provide public notice to the community to allow all interested parties to apply for appointment. The school board shall endeavor to appoint members who represent various points of view within the community regarding comprehensive health education.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 270

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 136.
Wellness program; Advisory Council on Wellness and Comprehensive Health.

As used in this section:

“Fitness program” means a program that includes a physical education program and a physical activity program.

“Nutrition” includes all food and beverages sold or served in the food service program, vending machines, snack bars, and school stores.

“Physical activity program” means a program that includes, in addition to regular physical education classes, minimum daily physical activity for each student provided through activities such as recess and other recreation periods, and participation in athletics either during or after regular school hours. “Physical activity” means moderate and vigorous physical activities.

“Physical education program” means a sequential, developmentally appropriate program that is an enjoyable experience for students and is designed to help students develop the knowledge, skill, self-management skill, attitudes, and confidence needed to adopt and maintain physical fitness throughout their lives.

“Wellness program” means a program that includes physical fitness and comprehensive health education as defined in section 131 of this title.

The Secretary shall establish an Advisory Council on Wellness and Comprehensive Health that shall include at least three members with expertise in health services, health education, or health policy; at least one member who is a school counselor; and at least one member who is a school social worker. The members shall serve without compensation. The Council shall assist the Agency to plan, coordinate, and encourage wellness and comprehensive health programs in the public schools and shall meet not less than twice a year. The Council shall also examine and coordinate state health wellness policies and federal wellness policies to identify and, if possible, eliminate any redundancies.

The Secretary shall collaborate with other agencies and councils working on childhood wellness to:

Supervise the preparation of appropriate wellness program curricula for use in the public schools, promote programs for the preparation of teachers to teach these curricula, and assist in the development of wellness programs.

[Repealed.]

Establish and maintain a website that displays data from a youth risk behavior survey in a way that enables the public to aggregate and disaggregate the information.

Research funding opportunities for schools and communities that wish to build wellness programs and make the information available to the public.

[Repealed.]

The Agency shall offer assistance to school districts and supervisory unions to provide teacher instruction in wellness programs.

Any school district board or supervisory union board may establish a wellness community advisory council to inventory community programs and assets and to assist the school board and community in developing and implementing wellness programs. The school board shall provide public notice to the community to allow all interested parties to apply for appointment. The school board shall endeavor to appoint members who represent various points of view and expertise within the community regarding wellness programs. Members may include representatives from coordinated school health teams, teachers, school administrators, students, community members, health care providers, parents, and others.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 135

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 5, 6, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2021, No. 66

, § 9, eff. June 7, 2021.